Illinois, session 104th, HB195.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Equine Infectious Anemia Control 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 65/1)  (from Ch. 8, par. 951)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may be 8cited as the "Illinois Equine Infectious Anemia Control Act".9(Source: P.A. 86-223.)